Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF2283.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 6805HH (3) 91 sb/js H.F. 2283 Section 1. NEW SECTION . 478.34 Grid-enhancing technologies 1 and reconductoring. 2 1. For purposes of this section: 3 a. âCapacityâ means the maximum amount of electricity that 4 can flow through a transmission line while observing industry 5 safety standards. 6 b. âCongestionâ means a condition in which a lack of 7 transmission line capacity prevents the delivery of the 8 lowest-cost electricity dispatched to meet the load demand at a 9 specific location. 10 c. âDynamic line rating systemâ means hardware or software 11 used to calculate the thermal limit of existing electric 12 transmission lines at a specific point in time by incorporating 13 information on real-time and forecasted weather conditions. 14 d. âGrid-enhancing technologyâ means hardware and software 15 that increases the capacity of electrical lines and improves 16 the congestion, efficiency, reliability, and safety of the 17 grid. âGrid-enhancing technologyâ includes but is not limited 18 to a dynamic line rating system, an advanced power flow control 19 system, or topology optimization. 20 e. âPower flow control systemâ means hardware and 21 software used to reroute electricity from overloaded electric 22 transmission lines to underutilized electric transmission 23 lines. 24 f. âReconductored with an advanced conductorâ means replacing 25 the existing electric conductor with a conductor that has a 26 direct current electrical resistance not less than ten percent 27 lower than existing conductors of a similar diameter on the 28 system and may include rebuilding support structures or other 29 associated facilities. 30 g. âThermal limitâ means the temperature an electric 31 transmission line reaches when heat from the electric current 32 flow within the electric transmission line causes excessive 33 sagging of the electric transmission line. 34 h. âTopology optimizationâ means a software technology 35 -1- LSB 6805HH (3) 91 sb/js 1/ 4 H.F. 2283 that uses mathematical models to identify reconfigurations 1 in the transmission grid in order to reroute electricity 2 from overloaded electric transmission lines to underutilized 3 electric transmission lines. 4 2. a. On or before January 1, 2027, and every three years 5 thereafter, each public utility or transmission company that 6 owns or operates an electric transmission line in Iowa shall 7 prepare and submit a study of the feasibility of projects 8 using grid-enhancing technologies and identifying which of 9 its transmission lines can be reconductored with an advanced 10 conductor to achieve one or more of the purposes listed in 11 paragraph âcâ . 12 b. The study shall provide information on feasibility, cost, 13 rating, implementation time, and any other information deemed 14 relevant by the utilities commission and be submitted to the 15 commission in a public filing. 16 c. The study required under paragraph âaâ shall be designed 17 to identify projects that can use grid-enhancing technologies 18 or reconductoring with an advanced conductor to achieve one or 19 more of the following purposes: 20 (1) Increase transmission capacity. 21 (2) Reduce transmission system congestion. 22 (3) Reduce curtailment of or increase capacity to connect 23 renewable and zero-carbon resources. 24 (4) Increase reliability. 25 (5) Reduce potential siting conflicts or land impacts from 26 the development of new electric transmission lines. 27 (6) Increase flexibility to reduce risks surrounding 28 technology and permitting uncertainties in statewide electrical 29 system planning and improve optionality for load-serving 30 entities. 31 (7) Reduce line losses. 32 (8) Increase the ability to quickly energize new customers 33 or serve increased customer load. 34 3. This section does not apply to a municipal utility, a 35 -2- LSB 6805HH (3) 91 sb/js 2/ 4 H.F. 2283 cooperative electric association, or a company or organization 1 that owns a transmission line that serves a single customer or 2 interconnects a single electric generating facility. 3 4. To meet the requirements of this section, reporting 4 parties may rely on available information and analysis 5 developed by a regional transmission organization or any 6 subgroup of a regional transmission organization and may 7 develop and include additional information as necessary. 8